languages/apertium-lvs/apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="skr/iet__vblex" c="? (iv) -iet"> 
      <e>       <p><l>iet</l>         <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ejiet</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ejam</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ien</l>         <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="skrien/ošs__pprs_act"/></e>
<!--
      <e>       <p><l>īj</l>         <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="cēl/is__pp_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īd</l>          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="mez/dams__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ām</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="zogam/s__pprs_psv"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iet</l>         <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lēkt/s__pp_psv"/></e>
-->
    
      <e>       <p><l>ienu</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ien</l>          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ien</l>          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ienam</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ienat</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ien</l>          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ēju</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ēji</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ēja</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ējām</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ējāt</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ēja</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>iešu</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iesi</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ies</l>         <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iesim</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iesit</l>      <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iesiet</l>       <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ies</l>         <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ietu</l>        <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ien</l>          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ieniet</l>      <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 

 
    <pardef n="dar/īt__vblex" c="III (tv) -īt"> 
      <e>       <p><l>īt</l>         <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ejīt</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ejam</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="skrien/ošs__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īj</l>         <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="cēl/is__pp_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īd</l>          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="mez/dams__pprs_act"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ām</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="zogam/s__pprs_psv"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īt</l>         <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lēkt/s__pp_psv"/></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ām</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>āt</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>īju</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īji</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īja</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ījām</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ījāt</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īja</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>īšu</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īsi</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īs</l>         <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īsim</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>īsit</l>      <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īsiet</l>       <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>īs</l>         <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ītu</l>        <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iet</l>      <r>īt<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 

  

    <e lm="prasīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pras</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skriet"><par n="ne"/><i>skr</i><par n="skr/iet__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apšaubīt"><par n="ne"/><i>apšaub</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="atbīdīt"><par n="ne"/><i>atbīd</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="atstāstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>atstāst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="atsūtīt"><par n="ne"/><i>atsūt</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="attīrīt"><par n="ne"/><i>attīr</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="baudīt"><par n="ne"/><i>baud</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dalīt"><par n="ne"/><i>dal</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="glaudīt"><par n="ne"/><i>glaud</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grozīt"><par n="ne"/><i>groz</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iebaudīt"><par n="ne"/><i>iebaud</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iemainīt"><par n="ne"/><i>iemain</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ierakstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>ierakst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ietaupīt"><par n="ne"/><i>ietaup</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izadīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izad</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izbaudīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izbaud</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izbrīnīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izbrīn</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izcīnīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izcīn</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izdarīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izdar</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izmainīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izmain</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izstāstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>izstāst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klāstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>klāst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kratīt"><par n="ne"/><i>krat</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mainīt"><par n="ne"/><i>main</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mānīt"><par n="ne"/><i>mān</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neiemācīt"><par n="ne"/><i>neiemāc</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nemācīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nemāc</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nepadarīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nepadar</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nepaprasīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nepapras</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nepierādīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nepierād</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nerādīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nerād</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nesmaidīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nesmaid</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nodarīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nodar</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nolaupīt"><par n="ne"/><i>nolaup</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="norakstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>norakst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="noskūpstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>noskūpst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="notīrīt"><par n="ne"/><i>notīr</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="padarīt"><par n="ne"/><i>padar</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="paklausīt"><par n="ne"/><i>paklaus</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="paraustīt"><par n="ne"/><i>paraust</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pasmaidīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pasmaid</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pastāstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pastāst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pataustīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pataust</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piemānīt"><par n="ne"/><i>piemān</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pieprasīt"><par n="ne"/><i>piepras</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pieskaitīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pieskait</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pildīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pild</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="radīt"><par n="ne"/><i>rad</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="raidīt"><par n="ne"/><i>raid</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rakstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>rakst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sagaidīt"><par n="ne"/><i>sagaid</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sagūstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>sagūst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saklausīt"><par n="ne"/><i>saklaus</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="samanīt"><par n="ne"/><i>saman</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saskatīt"><par n="ne"/><i>saskat</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sildīt"><par n="ne"/><i>sild</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skraidīt"><par n="ne"/><i>skraid</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sodīt"><par n="ne"/><i>sod</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stāstīt"><par n="ne"/><i>stāst</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="taisīt"><par n="ne"/><i>tais</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzguldīt"><par n="ne"/><i>uzguld</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzlaizīt"><par n="ne"/><i>uzlaiz</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzrādīt"><par n="ne"/><i>uzrād</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzsildīt"><par n="ne"/><i>uzsild</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uztaisīt"><par n="ne"/><i>uztais</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vadīt"><par n="ne"/><i>vad</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
